test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sgpar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sgpar: # 7 x contlex sg par -- kontrollerad av Elina
    afäärimies+N+Sg+Par: afäärimiestä
    eusmies+N+Sg+Par: eusmiestä
    frahtimies+N+Sg+Par: frahtimiestä
    hakkomies+N+Sg+Par: hakkomiestä
    ikämies+N+Sg+Par: ikämiestä
    irtimies+N+Sg+Par: irtimiestä
    iskemämies+N+Sg+Par: iskemämiestä
    elläin+N+Sg+Par: elläintä
    irtain+N+Sg+Par: irtainta
    istuin+N+Sg+Par: istuinta
    jäänhalkein+N+Sg+Par: jäänhalkeinta
    jäsenyin+N+Sg+Par: jäsenyintä
    jaskin+N+Sg+Par: jaskinta
    äänestys+N+Sg+Par: äänestystä
    äärettömyys+N+Sg+Par: äärettömyyttä
    # äes+N+Sg+Par: äkestä # VetEj
    ähmäänys+N+Sg+Par: ähmäänystä
    ajos+N+Sg+Par: ajosta
    äkäsyys+N+Sg+Par: äkäsyyttä
    annos+N+Sg+Par: annosta
    ahmajäsen+N+Sg+Par: ahmajäsentä
    ahven+N+Sg+Par: ahventa
    askel+N+Sg+Par: askelta
    höyhen+N+Sg+Par: höyhentä
    isosisar+N+Sg+Par: isosisarta
    jääntanner+N+Sg+Par: jääntannerta
    jalkatyär+N+Sg+Par: [jalkatytärtä, jalkatyärtä]
    ahneus+N+Sg+Par: ahneutta
    falskeus+N+Sg+Par: falskeutta
    fariseeus+N+Sg+Par: fariseeutta
    fiineys+N+Sg+Par: fiineyttä
    fiiniys+N+Sg+Par: fiiniyttä
    ilfheys+N+Sg+Par: ilfheyttä
    ilkeys+N+Sg+Par: ilkeyttä
    jiddisch+N+Sg+Par: jiddischiä
    -kielinen+N+Sg+Par: -kielistä
    äärheinen+N+Sg+Par: äärheistä
    ainukainen+N+Sg+Par: ainukaista
    ammuminen+N+Sg+Par: ammumista
    ampiainen+N+Sg+Par: ampiaista
    ästiitiäinen+N+Sg+Par: ästiitiäistä
    äykiäinen+N+Sg+Par: äykiäistä
    aavistus+N+Sg+Par: aavistusta
    ahistus+N+Sg+Par: ahistusta
    aivastus+N+Sg+Par: aivastusta
    ajatus+N+Sg+Par: ajatusta
    anomus+N+Sg+Par: anomusta
    arvaus+N+Sg+Par: arvausta
    astutus+N+Sg+Par: astutusta
    aamuvyö+N+Sg+Par: aamuvyötä
    äkäpää+N+Sg+Par: äkäpäätä
    äkkipää+N+Sg+Par: äkkipäätä
    ärräpää+N+Sg+Par: ärräpäätä
    asepuu+N+Sg+Par: asepuuta
    äyrinmaa+N+Sg+Par: äyrinmaata
    takkaa-ajo+N+Sg+Par: takkaa-ajoa
    a-malmi+N+Sg+Par: a-malmia
    ääkkä+N+Sg+Par: ääkkää
    aalto+N+Sg+Par: aaltoa
    abortti+N+Sg+Par: aborttia
    aho+N+Sg+Par: ahoa
    äijäfaari+N+Sg+Par: äijäfaaria
    troppi+N+Sg+Par: troppia
    aihe+N+Sg+Par: aihetta
    äile+N+Sg+Par: äilettä
    aine+N+Sg+Par: ainetta
    alote+N+Sg+Par: alotetta
    alue+N+Sg+Par: aluetta
    alushame+N+Sg+Par: alushametta
    akleija+N+Sg+Par: akleijaa
    äkseerinki+N+Sg+Par: äkseerinkiä
    almunakka+N+Sg+Par: almunakkaa
    alttari+N+Sg+Par: alttaria
    ämmäkkö+N+Sg+Par: ämmäkköä
    ammunta+N+Sg+Par: ammuntaa
    anikka+N+Sg+Par: anikkaa
    ääri+N+Sg+Par: äärtä
    äitiväki+N+Sg+Par: äitiväkeä
    ehontähti+N+Sg+Par: ehontähteä
    ehtotähti+N+Sg+Par: ehtotähteä
    elämänonni+N+Sg+Par: elämänonnea
    epiteemi+N+Sg+Par: epiteemiä
    flaattakivi+N+Sg+Par: flaattakiveä
    äitinkieli+N+Sg+Par: äitinkieltä
    äitipuoli+N+Sg+Par: äitipuolta
    asuntolohi+N+Sg+Par: asuntolohta
    hiili+N+Sg+Par: hiiltä
    aikakausi+N+Sg+Par: aikakautta
    färivesi+N+Sg+Par: färivettä
    hangonvarsi+N+Sg+Par: hangonvartta
    hirsi+N+Sg+Par: hirttä
    ikävuosi+N+Sg+Par: ikävuotta
    ilovesi+N+Sg+Par: ilovettä
    irtivesi+N+Sg+Par: irtivettä
    imulapsi+N+Sg+Par: imulasta
    irtilapsi+N+Sg+Par: irtilasta
    jalkalapsi+N+Sg+Par: jalkalasta
    jumalanlapsi+N+Sg+Par: jumalanlasta
    kapalolapsi+N+Sg+Par: kapalolasta
    kasvattilapsi+N+Sg+Par: kasvattilasta
    kusilapsi+N+Sg+Par: kusilasta
    höttölumi+N+Sg+Par: höttölunta
    iloliemi+N+Sg+Par: [ilolientä, iloliemeä]
    kalanliemi+N+Sg+Par: [kalanlientä, kalanliemeä]
    kankhaanloimi+N+Sg+Par: [kankhaanlointa, kankhaanloimea]
    lähetystoimi+N+Sg+Par: [lähetystointa, lähetystoimea]
    liemi+N+Sg+Par: [lientä, liemeä]
    lihaliemi+N+Sg+Par: [lihalientä, lihaliemeä]
    auttavaisuus+N+Sg+Par: auttavaisuutta
    hankaluus+N+Sg+Par: hankaluutta
    hiljasuus+N+Sg+Par: hiljasuutta
    huoruus+N+Sg+Par: huoruutta
    iänkaikkisuus+N+Sg+Par: iänkaikkisuutta
    itusuus+N+Sg+Par: itusuutta
    jatkuvuus+N+Sg+Par: jatkuvuutta
    raja-asukas+N+Sg+Par: raja-asukasta
    aijas+N+Sg+Par: aijasta
    ankerias+N+Sg+Par: ankeriasta
    apilas+N+Sg+Par: apilasta
    asukas+N+Sg+Par: asukasta
    ehokas+N+Sg+Par: ehokasta
    evankeeljum+N+Sg+Par: evankeeljumia
    ameriikalainen+N+Sg+Par: ameriikalaista
    Antinpäivä+N+Sg+Par: Antinpäivää
    Kruunu+N+Sg+Par: Kruunua
    Kyriiri+N+Sg+Par: Kyriiriä
    Laurina+N+Sg+Par: Laurinaa
    Mikkelinpäivä+N+Sg+Par: Mikkelinpäivää
    norrlänska+N+Sg+Par: norrlänskaa
    TV-masti+N+Sg+Par: TV-mastia
    äänensävy+N+Sg+Par: äänensävyä
    alunastifti+N+Sg+Par: alunastiftiä
    romani chib+N+Sg+Par: romani chibiä
